Illinois, session 104th, HB3381.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 53-14.20, 19b-1.1, 19b-1.2, 19b-1.3, 19b-1.4, 19b-2, 19b-3, 619b-4, 19b-5, 19b-7, and 19b-8 and by adding Sections 19b-1.5, 719b-2.1, and 19b-90 as follows: 8    (105 ILCS 5/3-14.20)  (from Ch. 122, par. 3-14.20)9    Sec. 3-14.20. Building plans and specifications. To 10inspect the building plans and specifications, including but 11not limited to plans and specifications for the heating, 12ventilating, lighting, seating, water supply, toilets, energy 13conservation measures resulting in building construction, 14renovations, or modifications, and safety against fire of 15public school rooms and buildings submitted to the regional 16superintendent of schools him by school boards, and to approve 17all those which comply substantially with the building code 18authorized in Section 2-3.12.19    If a municipality or, in the case of an unincorporated 20area, a county or, if applicable, a fire protection district 21wishes to be notified of plans and specifications received by 22a regional office of education for any future construction or 23alteration of a public school facility located within that   HB3381- 2 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1entity's jurisdiction, then the entity must register this wish 2with the regional superintendent of schools. Within 10 days 3after the regional superintendent of schools receives the 4plans and specifications from a school board and prior to the 5bidding process, he or she shall notify, in writing, the 6registered municipality and, if applicable, the registered 7fire protection district where the school that is being 8constructed or altered lies that plans and specifications have 9been received. In the case of an unincorporated area, the 10registered county shall be notified. If the municipality, fire 11protection district, or county requests a review of the plans 12and specifications, then the school board shall submit a copy 13of the plans and specifications. The municipality and, if 14applicable, the fire protection district or the county may 15comment in writing on the plans and specifications based on 16the building code authorized in Section 2-3.12, referencing 17the specific code where a discrepancy has been identified, and 18respond back to the regional superintendent of schools within 1915 days after a copy of the plans and specifications have been 20received or, if needed for plan review, such additional time 21as agreed to by the regional superintendent of schools. This 22review must be at no cost to the school district.23    If such plans and specifications are not approved or 24denied approval by the regional superintendent of schools 25within 3 months after the date on which they are submitted to 26him or her, the school board may submit such plans and   HB3381- 3 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1specifications directly to the State Superintendent of 2Education for approval or denial.3(Source: P.A. 94-225, eff. 7-14-05.) 4    (105 ILCS 5/19b-1.1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-1.1)5    Sec. 19b-1.1. Energy conservation measure. "Energy 6conservation measure" means any improvement, repair, 7alteration, or betterment of any building or facility owned or 8operated by a school district or area vocational center or any 9equipment, fixture, or furnishing to be added to or used in any 10such building or facility, according to plans and 11specifications designed and approved subject to the building 12code authorized in Section 2-3.12 of this Code, that is 13proposed designed to reduce energy consumption or operating 14costs, and may include, without limitation, one or more of the 15following: 16        (1) Insulation of the building structure or systems 17    within the building. 18        (2) Storm windows or doors, caulking or 19    weatherstripping, multiglazed windows or doors, heat 20    absorbing or heat reflective glazed and coated window or 21    door systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass 22    area, or other window and door system modifications that 23    reduce energy operating costs consumption. 24        (3) Automated or computerized energy control systems. 25        (4) Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning system   HB3381- 4 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1    modifications or replacements. 2        (5) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures 3    to increase the energy efficiency of the lighting system 4    without increasing the overall illumination of a facility, 5    unless an increase in illumination is necessary to conform 6    to the applicable State or local building code for the 7    lighting system after the proposed modifications are made. 8        (6) Energy recovery systems. 9        (7) (Blank). Energy conservation measures that provide 10    long-term operating cost reductions.11    "Energy conservation measure" does not include new 12construction or building additions beyond the square footage 13and footprint of existing buildings or structures, except 14areas required for the primary use of mechanical and 15electrical upgrades or as necessary for the sole use of an 16energy unit installation, such as geothermal or solar array 17equipment. "Energy conservation measure" does not include new 18or additional spaces, such as classrooms, gymnasiums, or 19administrative or common areas, or site renovations, such as 20parking lots, playgrounds, athletic fields, or track and field 21areas. New construction or additions shall be designed and 22constructed in accordance with applicable energy conservation 23laws and codes and may not be included in the calculations of 24any energy savings with respect to a guaranteed energy savings 25contract. 26(Source: P.A. 95-612, eff. 9-11-07.)   HB3381- 5 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1    (105 ILCS 5/19b-1.2)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-1.2)2    Sec. 19b-1.2. Guaranteed energy savings contract. 3"Guaranteed energy savings contract" means a contract for: (i) 4the implementation of an energy audit, an investment grade 5audit, data collection, and other related analyses preliminary 6to the undertaking of energy conservation measures; (ii) the 7evaluation and recommendation of energy conservation measures; 8(iii) the implementation of one or more energy conservation 9measures; and (iv) the implementation of project monitoring 10and data collection to verify post-installation energy 11consumption and energy-related operating costs. The contract 12shall provide that all payments, except obligations on 13termination of the contract before its expiration, are to be 14made over time and that the savings are guaranteed to the 15extent necessary to pay the costs of the energy conservation 16measures. Energy saving may include energy reduction and 17offsetting sources of renewable energy funds including 18renewable energy credits and carbon credits. A contract may be 19subject to change orders in the ordinary course of a 20construction project but may not be amended to include 21projects not originally included in the request for proposals 22required by Section 19b-1.4 of this Code. 23(Source: P.A. 96-1197, eff. 7-22-10.) 24    (105 ILCS 5/19b-1.3)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-1.3)  HB3381- 6 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1    Sec. 19b-1.3. Qualified provider. "Qualified provider" 2means a person or business whose employees are experienced and 3trained in the design, implementation, or installation of 4energy conservation measures. The minimum training required 5for any person or employee under this Section shall be the 6satisfactory completion of at least 40 hours of course 7instruction dealing with energy conservation measures. A 8person or business may not engage in the practice of 9architecture, engineering, or structural engineering unless 10the person is licensed or the business is registered in 11accordance with the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 121989, the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, or 13the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989 and the rules 14adopted pursuant to those Acts. A person or business may not 15engage in the practice of plumbing unless the person is 16licensed in accordance with the Illinois Plumbing License Law. 17A qualified provider to whom the contract is awarded shall 18give a sufficient bond to the school district or area 19vocational center for its faithful performance.20(Source: P.A. 92-767, eff. 8-6-02.) 21    (105 ILCS 5/19b-1.4)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-1.4)22    Sec. 19b-1.4. Request for proposals. "Request for 23proposals" means a competitive selection achieved by 24negotiated procurement. The request for proposals shall be 25submitted to the administrators of the Capital Development   HB3381- 7 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1Board Procurement Bulletin for publication and through at 2least one public notice, at least 30 days before the request 3date in a newspaper published in the district or vocational 4center area, or if no newspaper is published in the district or 5vocational center area, in a newspaper of general circulation 6in the area of the district or vocational center, from a school 7district or area vocational center that will administer the 8program, requesting innovative solutions and proposals for 9energy conservation measures. Proposals submitted shall be 10sealed. The request for proposals shall include all of the 11following: 12        (1) The name and address of the school district or 13    area vocation center. 14        (2) The name, address, title, and phone number of a 15    contact person. 16        (3) Notice indicating that the school district or area 17    vocational center is requesting qualified providers to 18    propose energy conservation measures through a guaranteed 19    energy savings contract. 20        (4) The date, time, and place where proposals must be 21    received. 22        (5) The evaluation criteria for assessing the 23    proposals. 24        (6) Any other stipulations and clarifications the 25    school district or area vocational center may require.26(Source: P.A. 95-612, eff. 9-11-07; 96-1197, eff. 7-22-10.)   HB3381- 8 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1    (105 ILCS 5/19b-1.5 new)2    Sec. 19b-1.5. Energy operating cost. "Energy operating 3cost" means any expenditure paid by a school district or area 4vocational center to a third party for the furnishing of heat, 5cold, power, electricity, water, or light to any building or 6facility owned or operated by a school district or area 7vocational center. "Energy operating cost" shall be directly 8related to the energy consumption costs of a structure paid to 9a utility provider. "Energy operating cost" does not include 10calculations related to general maintenance and custodial 11costs, including, but not limited to, window cleaning, floor 12waxing, carpet vacuuming and cleaning, the mowing of lawns, 13trash removal, playground maintenance, parking lot 14maintenance, and similar costs. 15    (105 ILCS 5/19b-2)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-2)16    Sec. 19b-2. Evaluation of proposal; performance review. 17Before entering into a guaranteed energy savings contract 18under Section 19b-3, a school district or area vocational 19center shall submit a request for proposals. The school 20district or area vocational center shall evaluate any sealed 21proposal from a qualified provider. The evaluation shall 22analyze the estimates of all costs of installations, 23modifications or remodeling, including, without limitation, 24costs of a pre-installation energy audit or analysis, design,   HB3381- 9 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1engineering, installation, maintenance, repairs, debt service, 2conversions to a different energy or fuel source, or 3post-installation project monitoring, data collection, and 4reporting. The evaluation shall include a detailed analysis of 5whether either the energy consumed or the energy operating 6costs, or both, will be reduced and shall be submitted to the 7administrators of the Capital Development Board for 8publication in the Illinois Procurement Bulletin. If technical 9assistance is not available by a licensed architect or 10registered professional engineer on the school district or 11area vocational center staff, then the evaluation of the 12proposal shall be done by a registered professional engineer 13or architect, who is retained by the school district or area 14vocational center. A licensed architect or registered 15professional engineer evaluating a proposal or reviewing 16contract performance under this Section must certify in 17writing that he or she does not have any financial or 18contractual relationship with a qualified provider or other 19source that would constitute a conflict of interest. The 20school district or area vocational center may pay a reasonable 21fee for evaluation of the proposal or the review of contract 22performance or include the fee as part of the payments made 23under Section 19b-4.24    Performance reviews shall be conducted by the school board 25of the school district or the governing board of the area 26vocational center at least once every 4 years or at shorter   HB3381- 10 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1intervals at the discretion of the school district or area 2vocational center to verify the outcomes of the guaranteed 3energy savings contract and shall include any improvement, 4repair, alteration, or betterment of any building or facility 5owned or operated by the school district or area vocational 6center or any equipment, fixture, or furnishing added to or 7used in any such building or facility. A qualified provider 8may not withhold the disclosure of information related to the 9content of a proposal or the performance of the contract.10(Source: P.A. 95-612, eff. 9-11-07.) 11    (105 ILCS 5/19b-2.1 new)12    Sec. 19b-2.1. Submission of proposals. Proposals must be 13properly identified. Proposals may not be reviewed until after 14the deadline for submission has passed as set forth in the 15request for proposals. All qualified providers identified by 16the Smart Energy Design Assistance Center (SEDAC), in 17consultation with the Capital Development Board, pursuant to 18subsection (b) of Section 19b-90 of this Code that submit 19proposals shall be disclosed after the deadline for submission 20but not before. Proposals shall identify the names of all 21parties to the proposed contract, including those that may be 22subcontracted during the performance of the contract. A 23proposal must meet all material requirements of the request 24for proposal or the proposal may be rejected as nonresponsive. 25Proposals may be withdrawn prior to evaluation for any cause.   HB3381- 11 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1No person or business that contracts with a school district or 2area vocational center to write specifications or otherwise 3provides specifications or assessments for a procurement need 4under this Section shall submit a bid or proposal or receive a 5contract for that procurement need. All projects procured 6under this Section shall comply with Section 2-3.12 of this 7Code and the Health/Life Safety Code for Public Schools set 8forth in 23 Ill. Adm. Code 180, if applicable, and are subject 9to review by the regional office of education. 10    (105 ILCS 5/19b-3)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-3)11    Sec. 19b-3. Award of guaranteed energy savings contract. 12Sealed proposals must be opened by a member or employee of the 13school board or governing board of the area vocational center, 14whichever is applicable, at a public opening at which the 15contents of the proposals must be announced. Each person or 16entity submitting a sealed proposal must receive at least 13 17days notice of the time and place of the opening. The school 18district or area vocational center shall select the lowest 19responsive and responsible qualified provider that best meets 20the needs of the district or area vocational center. The 21school district or area vocational center shall provide public 22notice of the meeting at which it proposes to award a 23guaranteed energy savings contract of the names of the parties 24to the proposed contract and of the purpose of the contract. 25The public notice shall be made at least 10 days prior to the   HB3381- 12 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1meeting. After evaluating the proposals under Section 19b-2, a 2school district or area vocational center may enter into a 3guaranteed energy savings contract with a qualified provider 4if it finds that the amount it would spend on the energy 5conservation measures recommended in the proposal would not 6exceed the amount to be saved in either energy operating or 7operational costs for the reasonably projected payback period 8for the improvements, as certified by resolution of the school 9district or area vocational center, or 20 years, whichever is 10less, or both, within a 20-year period from the date of 11installation, if the recommendations in the proposal are 12followed. Contracts let or awarded must be submitted to the 13administrators of the Capital Development Board Procurement 14Bulletin for publication. The final contract and any 15subsequent modifications and successful proposals, 16evaluations, and the performance review shall be considered 17public records under the Freedom of Information Act and 18subject to inspection and copying by the public.19(Source: P.A. 95-612, eff. 9-11-07; 96-1197, eff. 7-22-10.) 20    (105 ILCS 5/19b-4)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-4)21    Sec. 19b-4. Guarantee. The guaranteed energy savings 22contract shall include a written guarantee of the qualified 23provider that either the energy operating or operational cost 24savings, or both, will meet or exceed, within the reasonably 25projected payback period for the improvements, as certified by   HB3381- 13 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1resolution of the school district or area vocational center, 2or 20 years, whichever is less, the costs of the energy 3conservation measures. The qualified provider shall reimburse 4the school district or area vocational center for any 5shortfall of guaranteed energy savings projected in the 6contract. A qualified provider shall provide a sufficient bond 7to the school district or area vocational center for the 8installation and the faithful performance of all the measures 9included in the contract. The guaranteed energy savings 10contract may provide for payments over a period of time, not to 11exceed the reasonably projected payback period for the 12improvements, as certified by resolution of the school 13district or area vocational center, or 20 years, whichever is 14less, from the date of final installation of the measures.15(Source: P.A. 92-767, eff. 8-6-02.) 16    (105 ILCS 5/19b-5)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-5)17    Sec. 19b-5. Installment payment contract; lease purchase 18agreement. A school district or school districts in 19combination or an area vocational center may enter into an 20installment payment contract or lease purchase agreement with 21a qualified provider or with a third party, as authorized by 22law, for the funding or financing of the purchase and 23installation of energy conservation measures by a qualified 24provider. Every school district or area vocational center may 25issue certificates evidencing the indebtedness incurred   HB3381- 14 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1pursuant to the contracts or agreements. Any such contract or 2agreement shall be valid whether or not an appropriation with 3respect thereto is first included in any annual or 4supplemental budget adopted by the school district or area 5vocational center. Each contract or agreement entered into by 6a school district or area vocational center pursuant to this 7Section shall be authorized by official action of the school 8board or governing board of the area vocational center, 9whichever is applicable. The authority granted in this Section 10is in addition to any other authority granted by law.11    If an energy audit is performed by an energy services 12contractor for a school district within the 3 years 13immediately preceding the solicitation, then the school 14district must publish as a reference document in the 15solicitation for energy conservation measures the following: 16        (1) an executive summary of the energy audit provided 17    that the school district may exclude any proprietary or 18    trademarked information or practices; or19        (2) the energy audit provided that the school district 20    may redact any proprietary or trademarked information or 21    practices.22A school district may not withhold the disclosure of 23information related to (i) the school district's energy 24operating costs consumption of energy, (ii) the physical 25condition of the school district's facilities, and (iii) any 26limitations prescribed by the school district.  HB3381- 15 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1    The solicitation must include a written disclosure that 2identifies any energy services contractor or qualified 3provider that participated in the preparation of the 4specifications issued by the school district. If no energy 5services contractor or qualified provider participated in the 6preparation of the specifications issued by the school 7district, then the solicitation must include a written 8disclosure that no energy services contractor or qualified 9provider participated in the preparation of the specifications 10for the school district. The written disclosure shall be 11published in the Capital Development Board Procurement 12Bulletin with the Request for Proposal. 13(Source: P.A. 96-1197, eff. 7-22-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 14    (105 ILCS 5/19b-7)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-7)15    Sec. 19b-7. Energy operating Operational and energy cost 16savings. The school district or area vocational center shall 17document the operational and energy operating cost savings 18specified in the guaranteed energy savings contract and 19designate and appropriate that amount for an annual payment of 20the contract. If the annual energy operating cost savings are 21less than projected under the guaranteed energy savings 22contract, the qualified provider shall pay, within 90 days, 23the difference as provided in Section 19b-4.24(Source: P.A. 92-767, eff. 8-6-02.)   HB3381- 16 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1    (105 ILCS 5/19b-8)  (from Ch. 122, par. 19b-8)2    Sec. 19b-8. Available funds. A school district or area 3vocational center may use funds designated for energy 4operating cost operating or capital expenditures for any 5guaranteed energy savings contract, including purchases using 6installment payment contracts or lease purchase agreements. A 7school district or area vocational center that enters into 8such a contract or agreement may covenant in such contract or 9agreement that payments made thereunder shall be payable from 10the first funds legally available in each fiscal year.11(Source: P.A. 92-767, eff. 8-6-02.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/19b-90 new)13    Sec. 19b-90. Energy savings template, qualified providers, 14and Smart Energy Design Assistance Center (SEDAC).15    (a) Any contract under this Section shall utilize the 16template provided for such contracts through a statewide 17organization representing Illinois school business officials 18or follow the requirements in subsections (c) and (d) of this 19Section, at the discretion of the school district or area 20vocational center. 21    (b) The Smart Energy Design Assistance Center (SEDAC) 22based at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, under 23the direction of the Governor, shall assist school districts 24and area vocational centers in compiling a list of qualified 25energy service providers, with respect to the review of   HB3381- 17 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1performance contracts. 2    (c) At the request of a school district or area of 3vocational center, SEDAC shall establish guidelines and an 4approval process for awarding energy performance contracts. 5The guidelines adopted under this subsection (c) must require 6that the cost-savings projected by a qualified provider be 7reviewed by a licensed professional engineer who:8        (1) has a minimum of 3 years of experience in energy 9    calculation and review;10        (2) is not an officer or employee of a qualified 11    provider for the contract under review; and12        (3) is not otherwise associated with the contract.13    In conducting the review, the engineer shall focus 14primarily on the proposed improvements from an engineering 15perspective and the methodology and calculations related to 16energy-related cost savings. 17    (d) At the request of a school district or area of 18vocational center, SEDAC shall assist a school district or 19area vocational center in identifying, evaluating, and 20implementing cost-effective conservation projects at its 21facilities. The assistance shall include: 22        (1) providing technical and analytical support, 23    including the procurement of energy performance 24    contracting services; 25        (2) reviewing verification procedures for energy 26    savings; and   HB3381- 18 -LRB104 10706 LNS 20785 b1        (3) assisting in the structuring and arranging of 2    financing for energy performance contracting projects. 3    (e) SEDAC is authorized to fix, charge, and collect 4reasonable fees that will, subject to appropriation, be funded 5by the State.